Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1641SC (1) 91 je/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 96.11, subsection 6, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. An employing unit shall keep true and accurate work 3 records, containing information required by the department. 4 The records shall be open to inspection and copying by an 5 authorized representative of the department at any reasonable 6 time and as often as necessary. For each employee, the 7 employing unit shall keep such records for three years after 8 a calendar year in which remuneration that the records relate 9 to was paid to the employee. If the employing unit did not 10 pay remuneration, but remuneration was due, the employer shall 11 keep such records for three years after the calendar year in 12 which remuneration was due. An authorized representative of 13 the department may require from an employing unit a sworn or 14 unsworn report, with respect to individuals employed by the 15 employing unit, which the department deems necessary for the 16 effective administration of this chapter . 17 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 96.22 Employer field audits. 18 1. The department shall conduct field audits of employers 19 by examining employer records to determine compliance with 20 this chapter. Such audits shall be carried out by employer 21 field auditors employed by the department. Procedures for 22 such audits shall be in accordance with this section. The 23 department may establish additional procedures for employer 24 field audits consistent with this section by rule. 25 2. Prior to an employer field audit, the department shall 26 give the employer reasonable notice of the intent to audit and 27 conduct an in-person preaudit interview with the employer or 28 a designated representative of the employer at the employerâs 29 place of business or an alternative location mutually agreed 30 upon by the employer and the department. The employer and 31 the department may mutually agree to conduct the preaudit 32 interview through alternative means, including but not limited 33 to telephone, facsimile, electronic mail, or video conference. 34 3. Employer records subject to an employer field audit, 35 -1- LSB 1641SC (1) 91 je/js 1/ 4 S.F. _____ if such records are maintained by the employer, may include 1 individual pay records, federal internal revenue service forms 2 W-2 and 1099, cash disbursement journals and check registers 3 or the electronic equivalent thereof, federal and state tax 4 returns, and other records required by this section. 5 4. To verify the correct business entity is listed in 6 department files, the employer field auditor may examine 7 business licenses of the employer or legal documents related 8 to the initial establishment of the business entity or to 9 any employee to whom the applicability of this chapter is in 10 question. 11 5. To verify proper compliance by the employer with 12 reporting requirements of the department, an employer field 13 auditor shall conduct and document a detailed audit of check 14 stubs, weekly time cards, the electronic equivalent of such 15 documents, or other maintained source documents for at least 16 one employee for at least one quarter. The detailed audit may 17 be more comprehensive than provided in this subsection if the 18 employer field auditor finds discrepancies in such records. 19 6. The department shall establish procedures for an 20 employer to contest an employer field auditorâs decision 21 regarding the applicability of this chapter to an employee. 22 In any disputed case, the employer field auditor may, at the 23 discretion of the presiding officer, be granted access to 24 records to determine the remuneration paid for any calendar 25 quarter at issue occurring within three years prior to the 26 departmentâs issuance to the employer of a notice of intent to 27 audit. 28 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. The section of this Act enacting 29 section 96.22 applies to audits conducted by the department of 30 workforce development pursuant to chapter 96 commencing on or 31 after the effective date of this Act. 32